Utah statutes.
78A-2-203.   Rules -- Right to make -- Limitation -- Security.
(1)  Every court of record may make rules, not inconsistent with law, for its
own government and the government of its officers; but such rules must neither
impose any tax or charge upon any legal proceeding nor give any allowance to
any officer for service.
(2) (a)  The judicial council may provide, through the rules of judicial
administration, for security in or about a courthouse or courtroom, or
establish a secure area as prescribed in Section 76-8-311.1.
(b) (i)  If the council establishes a secure area under Subsection (2)(a), it
shall provide a secure firearms storage area on site so that persons with
lawfully carried firearms may store them while they are in the secure area.
(ii)  The entity operating the facility with the secure area shall be
responsible for the firearms while they are stored in the storage area
referred to in Subsection (2)(b)(i).
(iii)  The entity may not charge a fee to individuals for storage of their
firearms under Subsection (2)(b)(i).
(3) (a)  Unless authorized by the rules of judicial administration, any person
who knowingly or intentionally possesses a firearm, ammunition, or dangerous
weapon within a secure area established by the judicial council under this
section is guilty of a third degree felony.
(b)  Any person is guilty of violating Section 76-10-306 who transports,
possesses, distributes, or sells an explosive, chemical, or incendiary device,
as defined by Section 76-10-306, within a secure area, established by the
Judicial Council under this section.
